Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska3-211
Bonds; issuance; limitation.

Any bonds to be issued by any municipality pursuant to the provisions of sections 3-201 to 3-238 and 18-1502 shall be authorized and issued in the manner and within the limitation, except as herein otherwise provided, prescribed by the laws of this state or the charter of the municipality for the issuance and authorization of bonds thereof for the construction of works of internal improvements.

Laws 1945, c. 34, § 6(2), p. 159.